apertium-bis.bis.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="acr" /> 
		<sdef n="predet" /> 
		<sdef n="detnt" /> 
		<sdef n="top" /> 
		<sdef n="abbr" /> 
		<sdef n="ant" /> 
		<sdef n="al" /> 
		<sdef n="cog" /> 
		<sdef n="org" /> 
		<sdef n="atn" /> 
		<sdef n="enc" /> 
		<sdef n="pro" /> 
		<sdef n="tn" /> 
		<sdef n="n" /> 
		<sdef n="np" /> 
		<sdef n="adj" /> 
		<sdef n="f" /> 
		<sdef n="m" /> 
		<sdef n="mf" /> 
		<sdef n="sg" /> 
		<sdef n="pl" /> 
		<sdef n="adv" /> 
		<sdef n="preadv" /> 
		<sdef n="pr" /> 
		<sdef n="prn" /> 
		<sdef n="rel" /> 
		<sdef n="nn" /> 
		<sdef n="an" /> 
		<sdef n="aa" /> 
		<sdef n="ind" /> 
		<sdef n="itg" /> 
		<sdef n="det" /> 
		<sdef n="dem" /> 
		<sdef n="def" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
		<sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
		<sdef n="nt" /> 
		<sdef n="vbser" /> 
		<sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
		<sdef n="vblex" /> 
		<sdef n="vbmod" /> 
		<sdef n="inf" /> 
		<sdef n="ger" /> 
		<sdef n="pp" /> 
		<sdef n="p1" /> 
		<sdef n="p2" /> 
		<sdef n="p3" /> 
		<sdef n="pii" /> 
		<sdef n="ifi" /> 
		<sdef n="fti" /> 
		<sdef n="cni" /> 
		<sdef n="prs" /> 
		<sdef n="pis" /> 
		<sdef n="fts" /> 
		<sdef n="imp" /> 
		<sdef n="pos" /> 
		<sdef n="sp" /> 
		<sdef n="ref" /> 
		<sdef n="sup" /> 
		<sdef n="ord" /> 
		<sdef n="qnt" /> 
		<sdef n="num" /> 
		<sdef n="pron" /> 
		<sdef n="ij" /> 
		<sdef n="sent" /> 
		<sdef n="cm" /> 
		<sdef n="lpar" /> 
		<sdef n="rpar" /> 
		<sdef n="lquest" /> 
		<sdef n="web" /> 
		<sdef n="apos" /> 
		<sdef n="percent" /> 
		<sdef n="guio" /> 
		<sdef n="past" /> 
		<sdef n="sep" /> 
		<sdef n="sint" /> 
		<sdef n="email" /> 
		<sdef n="obj" /> 
		<sdef n="subj" /> 
		<sdef n="subs" /> 
		<sdef n="pprs" /> 
		<sdef n="url" /> 
		<sdef n="gen" /> 
		<sdef n="vbdo" /> 
		<sdef n="comp" /> 
		<sdef n="pres" /> 
		<sdef n="vaux" /> 
		<sdef n="sym" /> 
		<sdef n="ND" /> 
		<sdef n="GD" /> 
	</sdefs>

	<pardefs>
		<pardef n="guionet">
			<e>	<p>	  <l>-</l>	  <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
   		 </pardef>
		
		<pardef n="coma">
			<e>	<p>	  <l>,</l>	  <r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="aposchar">
			<e>	  <i>'</i>		</e>
			<e r="LR"><p>	  <l>’</l>	  <r>'</r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<pardef n="cometa">
			<e>	  <par n="aposchar"/>	 <p>	  <l></l>	  <r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="separa">
			<e>	<re>[.\?;:!]+</re>	<p>	  <l></l>	  <r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		    
		<pardef n="separ">
			<e>	<re>[¿¡]</re>	<p>	  <l></l>	  <r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		    
		<pardef n="paresq">
			<e>	<re>[\(\[]</re>	<p>	  <l></l>	  <r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		    
		<pardef n="pardret">
			<e>	<re>[\)\]]</re>	<p>	  <l></l>	  <r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
			  
		<pardef n="emails">
			<e>	<re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re>	<p>	  <l></l>	  <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		  
		<pardef n="urls">
			<e>	<re>((www.)[a-z\-]+[.][a-z]+)</re>	<p>	  <l></l>	  <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		
		<!-- Pronoun paradigm -->
		<pardef n="prn__prn">
	        <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/></r></p></e>
   		</pardef>
		
		<!-- Determiner paradigm -->
		<pardef n="det__det">
			<e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="det"/></r></p></e>
   		</pardef>
   		
		<!-- Adjective paradigm -->
		<pardef n="adj__adj">
			<e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
   		</pardef>
		<!-- Adverb paradigm -->
		<pardef n="adv__adv">
			<e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
   		</pardef>
		<!-- Noun paradigm -->
		<pardef n="noun__n">
			<e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
   		</pardef>
		<!-- Numeral paradigm -->
		<pardef n="num__num">
			<e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
   		</pardef>
		<!-- Verb paradigm -->
		<pardef n="verb__vblex">
			<e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
   		</pardef>
		<!-- Preposition paradigm -->
		<pardef n="pr__pr">
			<e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<!-- Interjection paradigm -->
		<pardef n="ij__ij">
			<e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<!-- Toponym paradigm -->
		<pardef n="top__top">
			<e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="top"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>	
	</pardefs>

	    <e lm="hem"><i>hem</i><par n="prn__prn"/></e>
        <e lm="mi"><i>mi</i><par n="prn__prn"/></e>
        <e lm="olgeta"><i>olgeta</i><par n="prn__prn"/></e>
        <e lm="togeta"><i>togeta</i><par n="prn__prn"/></e>
        <e lm="yu"><i>yu</i><par n="prn__prn"/></e>
        <e lm="yumi"><i>yumi</i><par n="prn__prn"/></e>
        <e lm="em"><i>em</i><par n="prn__prn"/></e>
	    <e lm="ol"><i>ol</i><par n="det__det"/></e>
	    <e lm="mi"><i>mi</i><par n="det__det"/></e>
	    <e lm="yu"><i>yu</i><par n="det__det"/></e>
        <e lm="olgeta"><i>olgeta</i><par n="det__det"/></e>
	    <e lm="yumi"><i>yumi</i><par n="det__det"/></e>
        <e lm="em"><i>em</i><par n="det__det"/></e>
		<e lm="agensem"><i>agensem</i><par n="pr__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="bitwin"><i>bitwin</i><par n="pr__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="blo"><i>blo</i><par n="pr__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="blong"><i>blong</i><par n="pr__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="from"><i>from</i><par n="pr__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="lo"><i>lo</i><par n="pr__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="long"><i>long</i><par n="pr__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="wetaot"><i>wetaot</i><par n="pr__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="wetem"><i>wetem</i><par n="pr__pr"/></e>
		<e lm="eiti"><i>eiti</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="eitin"><i>eitin</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="fifti"><i>fifti</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="fiftin"><i>fiftin</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="seventi"><i>seventi</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="sikis"><i>sikis</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="sikstin"><i>sikstin</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="tetieit"><i>tetieit</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="tetifo"><i>tetifo</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="tetinaen"><i>tetinaen</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="tetisikis"><i>tetisikis</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="tetitu"><i>tetitu</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="tu"><i>tu</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="twanteeit"><i>twanteeit</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="twantenaen"><i>twantenaen</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="twantesikis"><i>twantesikis</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="wan"><i>wan</i><par n="num__num"/></e>
		<e lm="ale"><i>ale</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="babae"><i>babae</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="bulsit"><i>bulsit</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="ebe"><i>ebe</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="haleluia"><i>haleluia</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="hu"><i>hu</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="hurei"><i>hurei</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="iraira"><i>iraira</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="koloeni"><i>koloeni</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="lafrik"><i>lafrik</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="maekrangke"><i>maekrangke</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="nandeke"><i>nandeke</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="plis"><i>plis</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="sanvavis"><i>sanvavis</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="wanem"><i>wanem</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="wehem"><i>wehem</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="yi"><i>yi</i><par n="ij__ij"/></e>
		<e lm="Aravita"><i>Aravita</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Baravat"><i>Baravat</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Bwaga"><i>Bwaga</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Fanrereo"><i>Fanrereo</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Ipilmai"><i>Ipilmai</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Lambubu"><i>Lambubu</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Levlik"><i>Levlik</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Lorom"><i>Lorom</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Lowya"><i>Lowya</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Molpoi"><i>Molpoi</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Ngurua"><i>Ngurua</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Qoke"><i>Qoke</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Sisiol"><i>Sisiol</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Trebol"><i>Trebol</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Vuimberugu"><i>Vuimberugu</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="Yetapir"><i>Yetapir</i><par n="top__top"/></e>
		<e lm="blaen"><i>blaen</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="bunbun"><i>bunbun</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="dipskin"><i>dipskin</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="eklesia"><i>eklesia</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="fos"><i>fos</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="galvanaes"><i>galvanaes</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="hafhaf"><i>hafhaf</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="helti"><i>helti</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="kalite"><i>kalite</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="longfala"><i>longfala</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="nambatu"><i>nambatu</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="pablik"><i>pablik</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="rij"><i>rij</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="sentrol"><i>sentrol</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="sotsot"><i>sotsot</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="taet"><i>taet</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="wotapruf"><i>wotapruf</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
		<e lm="anda"><i>anda</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="andanit"><i>andanit</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="aninit"><i>aninit</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="antap"><i>antap</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="bagari"><i>bagari</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="bakegen"><i>bakegen</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="biaen"><i>biaen</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="bifo"><i>bifo</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="daon"><i>daon</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="kwiktaem"><i>kwiktaem</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="lastaem"><i>lastaem</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="naoia"><i>naoia</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="raonabaot"><i>raonabaot</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="tu"><i>tu</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="tunaet"><i>tunaet</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="wantaem"><i>wantaem</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="yestedei"><i>yestedei</i><par n="adv__adv"/></e>
		<e lm="Amerika"><i>Amerika</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="ba"><i>ba</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="bluflae"><i>bluflae</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="diksonari"><i>diksonari</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="Filadelfia"><i>Filadelfia</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="grep"><i>grep</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="jat"><i>jat</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="kaskrut"><i>kaskrut</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="kru"><i>kru</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="mami"><i>mami</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="namalaos"><i>namalaos</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="pamem"><i>pamem</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="prodius"><i>prodius</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="saentis"><i>saentis</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="Skeva"><i>Skeva</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="stued"><i>stued</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="tufes"><i>tufes</i><par n="noun__n"/></e>
		<e lm="baot"><i>baot</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="brodkas"><i>brodkas</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="draon"><i>draon</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="fanem"><i>fanem</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="fosem"><i>fosem</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="grisim"><i>grisim</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="jam"><i>jam</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="kavetem"><i>kavetem</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="kontak"><i>kontak</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="lesen"><i>lesen</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="mesa"><i>mesa</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="panisim"><i>panisim</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="promis"><i>promis</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="resevem"><i>resevem</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="seraot"><i>seraot</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="sponsarem"><i>sponsarem</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
		<e lm="traem"><i>traem</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
